District of Columbia statutes.
8-403.02

Information to be supplied multi-unit property residents and tenants.

At least 24 hours, and not more than 7 days, before the application of pesticides on a multi-unit property, the owner of the property shall provide each resident and tenant of the property that will be treated with the information listed in § 8-403.01 by:

(1)

Delivering the information to each resident’s door or mailbox, or to each resident through electronic mail or facsimile; and

(2)

Posting the information conspicuously in common spaces on the property, in reasonably close proximity to the locations where pesticide will be applied.

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 4b
as added June 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-168, § 2, 55 DCR 5180